Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-134
Foreign or alien company; certificate of authority; suspension or revocation; appeal.

Whenever the authority of a foreign or alien company to do business is suspended or revoked by its state of domicile or state of entry into the United States or whenever any of the grounds mentioned in section 44-4809, 44-4812, or 44-4817 exist as to a foreign or alien company, the Department of Insurance may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of such company to do business in this state, which order of suspension or revocation shall be subject to appeal, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 13, p. 404;

R.S.1913, § 3149;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 6, p. 581;

C.S.1922, § 7750;

C.S.1929, § 44-206;

R.S.1943, § 44-134;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 5, p. 1270;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 40;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 66.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.